Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.030

Visual and auditory screening of pupils—Record of screening—Forwarding of records, recommendations and data.

The person or persons completing the screening prescribed in RCW 28A.210.020 shall promptly prepare a record of the screening of each child found to have, or suspected of having, reduced visual and/or auditory acuity in need of attention, including the special education services provided by RCW 28A.155.010 through 28A.155.100, and send copies of such records and recommendations to the parents or guardians of such children and shall deliver the original records to the appropriate school official who shall preserve such records and forward to the superintendent of public instruction and the secretary of health visual and auditory data as requested by such officials.

[ 1991 c 3 s 289; 1990 c 33 s 188; 1971 c 32 s 3; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.31.040. Prior: 1941 c 202 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 4689-2. Formerly RCW 28A.31.040, 28.31.040.]